Florida, session 2026, SB1686.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âParagraph (f) is added to subsection (5) of 13 section 1004.4352, Florida Statutes, as created by SB 1684, 2026 14 Regular Session, to read: 15 1004.4352âParkinsonâs disease research.â 16 (5)âPARKINSONâS DISEASE REGISTRY.âSubject to a specific 17 appropriation, the department shall contract with the consortium 18 to establish and maintain a Parkinsonâs Disease Registry to 19 ensure that the Parkinsonâs disease data required to be 20 submitted under paragraph (a) is maintained and available for 21 use for research to advance therapies, improve patient outcomes, 22 and find potential cures for the disease. The department 23 contract must require the consortium to use a nationally 24 recognized platform to collect data from physicians as required 25 in paragraph (a). 26 (f)âAll records and personal identifying information 27 relating to persons diagnosed with or treated for Parkinsonâs 28 disease which is submitted to the registry under this subsection 29 are confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. 30 I of the State Constitution, except that: 31 1.âRelease may be made with the written consent of persons 32 to whom the information applies. 33 2.âThe department or the consortium may contact individuals 34 for the purpose of epidemiological investigation and monitoring, 35 provided information that is confidential under this subsection 36 is not further disclosed. 37 3.âThe department may enter into a data-sharing agreement 38 with any other governmental agency or entity for the purpose of 39 medical or scientific research, provided such governmental 40 agency or entity does not further disclose information that is 41 confidential under this subsection. 42 43 This paragraph is subject to the Open Government Sunset Review 44 Act in accordance with s. 119.15 and shall stand repealed on 45 October 2, 2031, unless reviewed and saved from repeal through 46 reenactment by the Legislature. 47 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 48 necessity that all records and personal identifying information 49 relating to persons diagnosed with or treated for Parkinsonâs 50 disease which is submitted to the Parkinsonâs Disease Registry 51 pursuant to s. 1004.4352(5), Florida Statutes, be made 52 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and 53 s. 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. The Department of 54 Health and the University of South Floridaâs Consortium for 55 Parkinsonâs Disease Research are unable to effectively implement 56 the legislative purpose of the Parkinsonâs Disease Registry, 57 created under s. s. 1004.4352(5), Florida Statutes, without 58 access to these records and information, which include personal 59 medical information, the disclosure of which would violate 60 federal patient privacy laws, including the Health Insurance 61 Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. Therefore, the 62 Legislature finds that it is a public necessity to make such 63 records and information held by the department confidential and 64 exempt to protect the privacy rights of persons diagnosed with 65 and treated for Parkinsonâs disease in this state and promote 66 the effective administration of the departmentâs epidemiological 67 research and tracking activities. 68 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 69 SB 1684 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 70 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 71 thereof and becomes a law.